Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 6.
Justification

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 109, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 6-2-601.
Applicability of article.

The common law shall govern in all cases not governed by this article.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 109, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 109, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 6-2-602.
Use of force in self defense; no duty to retreat.

The use of defensive force whether actual or threatened, is reasonable when it is the defensive force that a reasonable person in like circumstances would judge necessary to prevent an injury or loss, and no more, including deadly force if necessary to prevent imminent death or serious bodily injury to the person employing the deadly force or to another person. As used in this subsection, “necessary to prevent” includes a necessity that arises from an honest belief that the danger exists whether the danger is real or apparent.

A person is presumed to have held a reasonable fear of imminent peril of death or serious bodily injury to himself or another when using defensive force, including deadly force if:

The intruder against whom the defensive force was used was in the process of unlawfully and forcefully entering, or had unlawfully and forcibly entered, another’s home or habitation or, if that intruder had removed or was attempting to remove another against his will from his home or habitation; and

The person who uses defensive force knew or had reason to believe that an unlawful and forcible entry or unlawful and forcible act was occurring.

The presumption set forth in subsection (b) of this section does not apply if:

The person against whom the defensive force is used has a right to be in or is a lawful resident of the home or habitation, such as an owner, lessee or titleholder, and there is not an injunction for protection from domestic violence or a written pretrial supervision order of no contact against that person;

The person sought to be removed is a child or grandchild, or is otherwise in the lawful custody or under the lawful guardianship of, the person against whom the defensive force is used; or

The person against whom the defensive force is used is a peace officer or employee of the Wyoming department of corrections who enters or attempts to enter another’s home or habitation in the performance of his official duties.

A person who unlawfully and by force enters or attempts to enter another’s home or habitation is presumed to be doing so with the intent to commit an unlawful act involving force or violence.

A person who is attacked in any place where the person is lawfully present shall not have a duty to retreat before using reasonable defensive force pursuant to subsection (a) of this section provided that he is not the initial aggressor and is not engaged in illegal activity.

A person who uses reasonable defensive force as defined by subsection (a) of this section shall not be criminally prosecuted for that use of reasonable defensive force.

As used in this section:

“Habitation” means any structure which is designed or adapted for overnight accommodation, including, but not limited to, buildings, modular units, trailers, campers and tents, but does not include the inmate housing area of a jail, state penal institution or other secure facility under contract with the department of corrections to house inmates;

“Home” means any occupied residential dwelling place other than the inmate housing area of a jail, state penal institution or other secure facility under contract with the department of corrections to house inmates;

“Deadly force” means force that is intended or likely to cause death or serious bodily injury.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 109, § 1; 2011, ch. 142, § 1; 2018 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(i), substituted “home or habitation” for “occupied structure”; and added (d).

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(iii), inserted “or employee of the Wyoming department of corrections”; in (d)(i), added “but does not include the inmate housing area of a jail, state penal institution or other secure facility under contract with the department of corrections to house inmates” at the end; and in (d)(ii), added “other than the inmate housing area of a jail, state penal institution or other secure facility under contract with the department of corrections to house inmates” at the end.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, added (a); redesignated former (a) through (c) as (b) through (d); in (b), substituted “force, including deadly force if” for “force that is intended or likely to cause death or serious bodily injury to another if”; in (c)(iii), inserted “or employee of the Wyoming department of corrections” following “peace officer”; added (e) and (f); redesignated former (d) as (g); added (g)(iii); and made related changes.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 109, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

Charges properly dismissed. —

Construction. —

Jury instructions. —

Charges properly dismissed. —

Trial court did not err by dismissing the first-degree murder charge against defendant because an eyewitness stated that defendant stepped back into his home when the victim charged up the steps, another eyewitness stated that the victim sprinted straight for defendant, defendant told the officers he closed the door and the victim opened it and entered his home, and defendant said that the victim rushed him and he shot the victim. Because defendant was not the initial aggressor he did not have a duty to retreat. State v. John, 2020 WY 46, 460 P.3d 1122,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2020).

Construction. —

Subsection (f) is a mandatory immunity provision carrying with it a judicial gatekeeping function following the preliminary hearing. The accused must present a prima facie showing that subsection (f) applies; if the accused satisfies this minimal burden, the burden shifts to the State to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that subsection (f) does not apply.
State v. John, 2020 WY 46, 460 P.3d 1122,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2020).

Subsection (f) immunity claim does not constitute an objection based on defects in the institution of the prosecution, which the accused must raise before trial. The broad language at the beginning of Wyo. R. Crim. P. 12(b), however, permits the court to hear any defense, objection, or request capable of determination without trial; an accused may raise his subsection (f) immunity claim in reliance on that broad language. State v. John, 2020 WY 46, 460 P.3d 1122,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2020).

Wyoming abandoned the alter ego rule because it was incompatible with the Wyoming Criminal Code and ran counter to the self-defense statute. Smith v. State, 2021 WY 28, 480 P.3d 532,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2021).

Jury instructions. —

Trial court
did not abuse its discretion by declining defendant's request to instruct
the jury on self-defense in a home or habitation where he provided
no authority interpreting the definition of “habitation”
to include vehicles and no authority supporting his claim that a vehicle
may be “adapted” for overnight accommodation simply
by choosing to sleep in it. 2016 WY 1,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 1

.

Court erred in refusing defendant’s request to charge defense of another because the evidence was sufficient to support defendant’s reasonable belief that she had to act to defend her friend during the fight; defendant was trapped under the two men, the victim continued yelling that he was going to kill defendant’s friend, and during the fight, the victim kept trying to hit defendant’s friend and defendant held the victim’s arm to keep him from hitting her friend and to try to calm him. Smith v. State, 2021 WY 28, 480 P.3d 532,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2021).